Indiana, session 2026, HB1362.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-1-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 15. Physical Privacy of Hoosiers
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a public
building that may be used by more than one (1) individual at a time
and in which individuals may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "public building" means a
structure or part of a structure owned or leased by:
(1) the state government;
(2) a county government; or
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


(3) the government of a city, town, or township.
(b) The term does not include a:
(1) correctional facility, as defined in IC 11-8-11-1;
(2) juvenile detention facility, as defined in IC 31-31-8-2;
(3) school, as defined in IC 20-33-13.6-2; or
(4) state educational institution.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 4. Each governmental entity that owns or leases a public
building subject to this chapter shall designate each multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex, as determined at birth in
accordance with the individual's genetics and reproductive biology.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany an individual needing assistance if the
individual assisting the individual needing assistance is the
individual's parent or caregiver.
Sec. 6. During any activity or event authorized by a
governmental entity, a governmental entity may not require an
individual less than eighteen (18) years of age to share sleeping
quarters in a public building with a member of the opposite sex, as
determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology, unless the individual who is a member
of the opposite sex is a member of the individual less than eighteen
(18) years of age's family.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 5 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the
governmental entity if the governmental entity:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 5 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 5 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex;
as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology.
(b) If a governmental entity violates section 6 of this chapter, an
individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a result of the
violation may bring a civil action against the governmental entity.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 8. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a governmental entity
that leases or owns a public building subject to this chapter from:
(1) providing a single occupancy restroom, locker room,
changing room, or shower room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
SECTION 2. IC 11-8-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Physical Privacy in Correctional Facilities
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "correctional facility" has the
meaning set forth in IC 5-1.2-2-11.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a
correctional facility that may be used by more than one (1)
individual at a time and in which individuals may be in various
stages of undress in the presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


overnight.
Sec. 4. Each correctional facility shall designate each multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex, as determined at birth in
accordance with the individual's genetics and reproductive biology.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany an individual needing assistance if the
individual assisting the individual needing assistance is the
individual's parent or caregiver.
Sec. 6. A correctional facility may not require a committed
person to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite
sex, as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's
genetics and reproductive biology, unless the individual who is a
member of the opposite sex is a member of the committed person's
family.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 5 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the
correctional facility if the correctional facility:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 5 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 5 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex;
as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology.
(b) If a correctional facility violates section 6 of this chapter, an
individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a result of the
violation may bring a civil action against the correctional facility.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 8. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a correctional facility
from:
(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
SECTION 3. IC 20-33-13.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13.6. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a school
building that may be used by more than one (1) student at a time
and in which students may be in various stages of undress in the
presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "school" means any:
(1) school maintained by a school corporation; or
(2) charter school;
that provides instruction to students in any combination of
kindergarten through grade 12.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 4. Each school shall designate each multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


for the sex that is the individual's sex, as determined at birth in
accordance with the individual's genetics and reproductive biology.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To provide coaching or athletic training during athletic
events, provided that the individual took reasonable steps
to ensure no individuals are in a state of undress prior to
entering.
(D) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is the student's parent or
caregiver.
Sec. 6. During any activity or event authorized by a school in
which students share sleeping quarters, a school may not require
a student to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite
sex, as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's
genetics and reproductive biology, unless the individual of the
opposite sex is a member of the student's family.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 5 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the school
corporation or school if the school corporation or school:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 5 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 5 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex;
as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology.
(b) If a school or school corporation violates section 6 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the school or
school corporation.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 8. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a school corporation or
school from:
(1) providing a single occupancy restroom, locker room,
changing room, or shower room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
SECTION 4. IC 21-39-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Physical Privacy of Students
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a state
educational institution building that may be used by more than one
(1) student at a time and in which students may be in various stages
of undress in the presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 3. Each state educational institution shall designate each
multiple occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex, as determined at birth in
accordance with the individual's genetics and reproductive biology.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex;
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany a student needing assistance if the
individual assisting the student is the student's parent or
caregiver; or
(3) individual or student is entering a multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area to assist the individual's or
student's child.
Sec. 5. A state educational institution may not require a student
to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex, as
determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology:
(1) during any activity or event authorized by a state
educational institution; or
(2) in state educational institution on campus housing;
unless the individual who is a member of the opposite sex is a
member of the student's family.
Sec. 6. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 4 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the state
educational institution if the state educational institution:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 4 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 4 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex;
as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology.
(b) If a state educational institution violates section 5 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the state
educational institution.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 7. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 6 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 8. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state educational
institution from:
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
SECTION 5. IC 31-31-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Physical Privacy in Juvenile Detention Facilities
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "juvenile detention facility" has
the meaning set forth in IC 31-31-8-2.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "multiple occupancy
restroom or changing area" means a room or area in a juvenile
detention facility that may be used by more than one (1) individual
at a time and in which individuals may be in various stages of
undress in the presence of other individuals.
(b) The term includes a restroom, locker room, changing room,
and shower room.
(c) The term does not include a single occupancy restroom,
locker room, changing room, or shower room.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "sleeping quarters" means a
room with a bed in which more than one (1) individual is housed
overnight.
Sec. 4. Each juvenile detention facility shall designate each
multiple occupancy restroom or changing area as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex.
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an individual may only use
a multiple occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated
for the sex that is the individual's sex, as determined at birth in
accordance with the individual's genetics and reproductive biology.
(b) An individual does not violate subsection (a) if the:
(1) multiple occupancy restroom or changing area has been
temporarily designated for use by the opposite sex; or
(2) individual is entering a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area for one (1) or more of the following reasons:
(A) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes.
(B) To render medical or emergency assistance.
(C) To accompany an individual needing assistance if the
individual assisting the individual needing assistance is the
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152


individual's parent or caregiver.
Sec. 6. A juvenile detention facility may not require a juvenile
to share sleeping quarters with a member of the opposite sex, as
determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology, unless the individual who is a member
of the opposite sex is a member of the juvenile's family.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual who encounters an individual violating
section 5 of this chapter may bring a civil action against the
juvenile detention facility if the juvenile detention facility:
(1) provided the individual who violated section 5 of this
chapter permission to use a multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area that is designated for the sex that is not the
individual's sex; or
(2) failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the individual
who violated section 5 of this chapter from using a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area that is designated for
the sex that is not the individual's sex;
as determined at birth in accordance with the individual's genetics
and reproductive biology.
(b) If a juvenile detention facility violates section 6 of this
chapter, an individual who is directly or indirectly injured as a
result of the violation may bring a civil action against the juvenile
detention facility.
(c) An action described in this section must be commenced
within two (2) years of the violation.
Sec. 8. The court may award to an individual who prevails in an
action under section 7 of this chapter any of the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Declaratory judgment.
(3) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a juvenile detention
facility from:
(1) providing single occupancy sleeping quarters or a single
occupancy restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower
room; or
(2) adopting policies necessary to accommodate individuals
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42
U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and any amendments and regulations
related to the Act.
2026 IN 1362—LS 6978/DI 152